District of Columbia statutes.
7-1131.20

Department of Mental Health Nurse Training Program.

(a)

There is established within the Department, in partnership with UDC, a nurse training program, which shall offer tuition reimbursement for courses at UDC for a licensed practical nurse employed by Saint Elizabeths Hospital to become a registered nurse or for a registered nurse employed by Saint Elizabeths Hospital to earn a Bachelor of Science in Nursing degree; provided, that the nurse earns at least a grade B and agrees, in writing, to continue his or her employment at Saint Elizabeths Hospital for a minimum of 2 years.

(b)

The Department shall:

(1)

In partnership with UDC, develop:

(A)

The Program; and

(B)

A course of study that accommodates the schedule of nurses employed full-time;

(2)

Administer the Program;

(3)

Subject to the availability of funds, establish the number, and amounts of, assistance that can be extended in any fiscal year;

(4)

Develop a competitive application process for nurses at Saint Elizabeths Hospital to participate in the Program; and

(5)

Provide remote access learning capacities at Saint Elizabeths Hospital, if feasible.

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 115e
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 5042(b), 59 DCR 8025
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.
This section is referenced in § 7-1131.02.